New York, session 2025-2026, A1033.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 450.60 of the criminal procedure 2 law is amended to read as follows: 3 3. An appeal from a judgment, sentence or order of a local criminal 4 court located outside of New York City must, except as otherwise 5 provided in this subdivision, be taken to the county court of the county 6 in which such judgment, sentence or order was entered. Provided, howev- 7 er, that, in the event such appeal is taken from a sentence of imprison- 8 ment, such appeal must be taken to the appellate division of the depart- 9 ment in which such judgment, sentence or order was entered. 10 [If the appellate division of the second, third or fourth department 11 has established an appellate term of the supreme court for its depart- 12 ment, it may direct that appeals from such judgments, sentences and 13 orders of such local criminal courts, or of particular classifications 14 of such local criminal courts, be taken to such appellate term of the 15 supreme court instead of to the county court; and in such case such an 16 appeal must be so taken.] 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day 18 after it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02304-01-5